Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 21 Excise Tax on Commercial Transportation of Coal [Repealed]

§§ 39-21-101 through 39-21-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 1 § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This chapter, which derived from
Laws 2000, ch. 102, § 1, related to the excise tax on commercial transportation of coal.

Laws 2004, ch. 1, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2004.

Prior to the chapter's repeal by Laws 2004, ch. 1, § 1, Burlington N. & Santa Fe Ry. v. Atwood, 271 F. Supp. 2d 1359, 2003 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17079 (D. Wyo. 2003) had held that the Wyoming Coal Transportation Tax under §§

39-21-101

through 39-21-111 singled out the railroads for the imposition of a tax that was not generally applicable to other commercial and industrial taxpayers and that tax resulted in a discriminatory treatment of common carriers by rail; the fact that it also applied to a very small number of other taxpayers who paid considerably less than one percent of the tax did not diminish that fact. Therefore, because the Coal Transportation Tax violated the provisions of § 306(1)(d) of the Railroad Revitalization and Regulatory Reform Act of 1976, 49 U.S.C.S. § 11501, which prohibits the imposition of any other tax which results in discriminatory treatment of a common carrier by rail, the Wyoming Department of Revenue was enjoined from assessing, levying, or collecting the Coal Transportation Tax.